Idaho, session 2025, S1129.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 6, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 37, Title 6, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 37
DEPRIVATION OF RELIGIOUS LIBERTY OR FREEDOM OF SPEECH BY A GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITY
6-3701. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature hereby finds, deter-
mines, and declares that while section 4, article I of the constitution of
the state of Idaho provides for the guarantee of religious liberty and sec-
tion 9, article I of the constitution of the state of Idaho provides for the
guarantee of freedom of speech, current law does not provide a mechanism to
enforce these rights against governmental entities.
6-3702. DEFINITIONS. In addition to the terms defined in chapter 9,
title 6, Idaho Code, which shall apply to this chapter, "substantially bur-
den" means to inhibit or curtail religiously motivated practices.
6-3703. DEPRIVATION OF RELIGIOUS LIBERTY OR FREEDOM OF SPEECH -- RE-
DRESS. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any govern-
mental entity or employee who subjects, or causes to be subjected, any citi-
zen of this state or other person within the jurisdiction thereof to the de-
privation of any rights, privileges, or immunities secured by section 4, ar-
ticle I of the constitution of the state of Idaho, providing for the guar-
antee of religious liberty, or section 9, article I of the constitution of
the state of Idaho, providing for the guarantee of freedom of speech, shall
be liable to such injured person in a civil action or other proper proceed-
ing for redress brought by such injured person, as provided in the Idaho tort
claims act, chapter 9, title 6, Idaho Code, and in this chapter.
(2) Any governmental entity or employee may substantially burden a
person's exercise of religion only if the governmental entity or employee
demonstrates that application of the burden to the person is both:
(a) Essential to further a compelling governmental interest; and


(b) The least restrictive means of furthering such compelling govern-
mental interest.
(3) The provisions contained in this chapter shall be in addition to
any other provision of chapter 9, title 6, Idaho Code, or any other federal
or state law and shall not be interpreted as denying any person the right of
seeking other proper remedies provided thereunder.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prevent a governing board from adopt-
ing reasonable policies and rules to regulate conduct at public meetings and
public hearings, including but not limited to a person's free exercise of
speech or religiously motivated practices within the context of the public
meeting or public hearing.
6-3704. AWARD OF ATTORNEY'S FEES AND COSTS. In any action or proceed-
ing to enforce a provision of section 4 or section 9, article I of the consti-
tution of the state of Idaho pursuant to this chapter, the court, in its dis-
cretion, may allow the prevailing party to pay reasonable attorney's fees up
to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) as part of the costs, except that
in any action brought against a judicial officer for an act or omission taken
in such officer's judicial capacity, such officer shall not be held liable
for any costs, including attorney's fees, unless such action was clearly in
excess of such officer's jurisdiction. In no case shall the award of such at-
torney's fees or any combination or total of such awards, together with other
costs and money judgment or judgments for damages exceed, in the aggregate,
the limitations on liability fixed by section 6-926, Idaho Code.
6-3705. LIMITATION ON DAMAGES. In no action seeking recovery of dam-
ages under section 4 or section 9, article I of the constitution of the state
of Idaho pursuant to this chapter, shall a judgment for noneconomic damages
be entered for a claimant exceeding the maximum amount of twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000).
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.